District of Columbia statutes.
16-4015

Coercive or violent relationship.

(a)

Before a prospective party signs a collaborative law participation agreement, a prospective collaborative lawyer shall make reasonable inquiry whether the prospective party has a history of a coercive or violent relationship with another prospective party.

(b)

Throughout a collaborative law process, a collaborative lawyer reasonably and continuously shall assess whether the party the collaborative lawyer represents has a history of a coercive or violent relationship with another party.

(c)

If a collaborative lawyer reasonably believes that the party the lawyer represents or the prospective party who consults the lawyer has a history of a coercive or violent relationship with another party or prospective party, the lawyer may not begin or continue a collaborative law process unless:

(1)

The party or the prospective party requests beginning or continuing the process; and

(2)

The collaborative lawyer reasonably believes that the safety of the party or prospective party can be protected adequately during the process.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
This section is referenced in § 16-4020.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 15 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.